Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1400.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; YOUTH MENTAL HEALTH URGENCY ROOM.new text end new text begin $1,600,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,600,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to Ramsey County for the ongoing operation of the youth mental health urgency room established in Laws 2022, chapter 99, article 1, section 44. new text end